Hawaii statutes.
§206E-12 Dedication for public facilities
as condition to development. The authority shall establish rules requiring
dedication for public facilities of land or facilities, or cash payments in
lieu thereof, by developers as a condition of developing real property pursuant
to the community development plan. Where state and county public facilities
dedication laws, ordinances, or rules differ, the provision for greater
dedication shall prevail. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1; am L 1984, c 15, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next